Louisiana, session 2026, HB1039.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:337.26(D)(1)(introductory paragraph), 337.67(C)(introductory
paragraph) and (1), 337.69(A), and 337.70(C)(3) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
47:337.26(D)(1)(g) and 337.28(E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§337.26. Contracts for purposes relating to collection of sales and use taxes
* * *
D.(1) Prior to initiating an examination or audit of a taxpayer, the local
collector shall provide notice of the intent to audit which shall be sent by certified
mail to the taxpayer at the taxpayer's last known address. Such The notice shall:
* * *
(g) Advise the taxpayer that executing a waiver of the prescriptive period
pursuant to R.S. 47:337.67(C)(1) is voluntary.
* * *
§337.28. Collector's authority to determine the tax in certain cases
* * *
E. Prior to making an estimate of tax due pursuant to Subsection A of this
Section, the collector shall provide the dealer with a written request that identifies
all books, records, papers, vouchers, accounts, and documents sought for
examination pursuant to R.S. 47:337.36. If the collector does not comply with the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1039 ENROLLED
requirements of this Subsection before issuing an estimated assessment, the
assessment shall be considered arbitrary pursuant to R.S. 47:337.28.1.
* * *
§337.67. Suspension and interruption of prescription
* * *
C. The running of such the prescriptive period may also be suspended as
follows:
(1) By means of a written agreement between the taxpayer and the collector
made prior to the lapse of such the prescriptive period. If a taxpayer and a collector
execute an agreement pursuant to this Paragraph, the parties may suspend the accrual
of additional interest or delinquency penalties on unpaid sales and use taxes during
the suspension of the prescriptive period.
* * *
§337.69. Interest on unpaid taxes
A. When any taxpayer fails to pay a tax, or any portion thereof, on or before
the day where it is required to be paid under the provisions of this Chapter, interest
shall be added to the amount of tax due. Such The interest shall be computed from
the due date until the tax is paid. The interest shall be an obligation to be collected
and accounted for in the same manner as if it were a part of the tax due and can may
be enforced in a separate action or in the same action for collection of the tax. and
Except as provided in R.S. 47:337.67(C)(1), interest shall not be waived or remitted.
* * *
§337.70. Penalty for failure to make timely return
* * *
C.
* * *
(3) The provisions of this Section shall not apply if the taxpayer has paid the
amount due under protest in accordance with R.S. 47:337.63, has executed a waiver
of prescription and an agreement to suspend the accrual of additional delinquency
penalties pursuant to R.S. 47:337.67(C)(1), or has entered into an installment
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1039 ENROLLED
agreement with the department for the payment of the amount due and is in
compliance with the terms of the agreement.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.